Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.060

Service of process on corporation.

Service of any process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4109; 1982 c 35 s 127; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.